Vermont, session 2025-2026, H40.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSES
(a) The purposes of this act are:
VT LEG #378788 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.40
2025 Page 2 of 10
(1) to reduce health care costs;
(2) to protect women’s access to prenatal, maternity, birthing,
postpartum, and newborn care services; and
(3) to ensure women have a choice in how and where they give birth.
(b) This act would achieve those purposes by:
(1) removing the certificate of need requirement for establishing a
freestanding birth center; and
(2) licensing and regulating birth centers.
Sec. 2. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Vermonters value reproductive rights and equity in health care
choices, including the right to give birth in the setting of one’s choice.
(2) In Vermont, the only birthing settings that women and families
currently have are to have their babies in a hospital or at home.
(3) Vermont is one of the last states to ensure access to freestanding
birth centers.
(4) The American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the
American Academy of Pediatrics, and the Society for Maternal-Fetal Medicine
all endorse the birth center model of care as a safe and evidence-based option
for individuals with low-risk pregnancies.
VT LEG #378788 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.40
2025 Page 3 of 10
(5) In 2018, the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services issued a
report on the “Strong Start for Mothers and Newborns” initiative, which found
that rates of preterm birth, low birthweight, and cesarean section were lower
among Medicaid participants who received care and delivered their babies in a
freestanding birth center than those who delivered in a hospital or other non-
birth center setting. In addition to better outcomes, the report also found that
costs for Medicaid participants who delivered at a birth center were more than
$2,000.00 lower per mother-infant pair during birth and the following year
than for the Medicaid participants who did not use a birth center.
(6) Birth centers are safe, supportive settings in which Vermonters can
receive prenatal, maternity, birthing, postpartum, and newborn care services.
Nationally, they have demonstrated better outcomes and reduced costs
compared with other birthing settings.
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 9435(a) is amended to read:
(a) Excluded from this subchapter are offices of physicians, dentists, or
other practitioners of the healing arts, meaning the physical places that are
occupied by such providers on a regular basis in which such providers perform
the range of diagnostic and treatment services usually performed by such
providers on an outpatient basis unless they are subject to review under
subdivision 9434(a)(4) of this title. The exclusion provisions of this subsection
shall also apply to birth centers licensed pursuant to chapter 53 of this title.
VT LEG #378788 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.40
2025 Page 4 of 10
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. chapter 53 is added to read:
CHAPTER 53. BIRTH CENTER LICENSING
§ 2351. DEFINITION
As used in this chapter, “birth center” means a facility:
(1) that is not a hospital or part of a hospital;
(2) at which births are planned to occur away from the pregnant
individual’s residence following a low-risk pregnancy; and
(3) that provides prenatal, labor and delivery, or postpartum care, or a
combination of these, as well as other related services in accordance with the
scopes of practice of the health care professionals practicing at the birth center.
§ 2352. LICENSE
No person shall establish, maintain, or operate a birth center in this State
without first obtaining a license for the birth center in accordance with this
chapter.
§ 2353. APPLICATION; FEE
(a) An application for licensure of a birth center shall be made to the
Department of Health on forms provided by the Department and shall include
all information required by the Department.
(b)(1) Each application for a license shall be accompanied by a licensing
fee of $250.00.
VT LEG #378788 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.40
2025 Page 5 of 10
(2) Fees collected under this section shall be credited to the Hospital
Licensing Fees Special Fund and shall be available to the Department of
Health to offset the costs of licensing birth centers.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, for an
application for renewal of a birth center’s license, the Department of Health
shall deem a licensed birth center that is currently accredited by the
Commission for the Accreditation of Birth Centers as satisfying the
requirements for renewal of the birth center’s license, upon submission of a
copy of the birth center’s official accreditation certificate and payment of the
application fee.
§ 2354. LICENSE REQUIREMENTS
(a) Upon receipt of an application for a license and the licensing fee, the
Department of Health shall issue a license if it determines that the applicant
and the birth center facilities meet the following minimum standards:
(1) The applicant shall demonstrate the capacity to operate a birth center
in accordance with rules adopted by the Department.
(2) The applicant shall demonstrate that its facilities comply fully with
standards for health, safety, and sanitation as required by State law, including
standards set forth by the State Fire Marshal and the Department of Health, and
municipal ordinance.
VT LEG #378788 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.40
2025 Page 6 of 10
(3) The applicant shall have a clear process for responding to patient
complaints.
(4) The birth center facilities, including the buildings and grounds, shall
be subject to inspection by the Department, its designees, and other authorized
entities at all times.
(b) A license is not transferable or assignable and shall be issued only for
the premises and persons named in the application.
(c) A birth center may be independently owned and operated by a licensed
or certified health care professional whose scope of practice includes the
services offered by the birth center, including a midwife licensed under
26 V.S.A. chapter 85 and a nurse midwife certified under 26 V.S.A. chapter
28, subchapter 2.
(d) No person shall represent itself as a “birth center” or use the term “birth
center” in its title or in its advertising, publications, or other form of
communication unless the person has been licensed as a birth center in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
§ 2355. REVOCATION OF LICENSE; HEARING
The Department of Health, after notice and opportunity for hearing to the
applicant or licensee, is authorized to deny, suspend, or revoke a license in any
case in which it finds that there has been a substantial failure to comply with
the requirements established under this chapter. Such notice shall be served by
VT LEG #378788 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.40
2025 Page 7 of 10
registered mail or by personal service, shall set forth the reasons for the
proposed action, and shall set a date not less than 60 days from the date of the
mailing or service on which the applicant or licensee shall be given
opportunity for a hearing. After the hearing, or upon default of the applicant or
licensee, the Department shall file its findings of fact and conclusions of law.
A copy of the findings and decision shall be sent by registered mail or served
personally upon the applicant or licensee. The procedure governing hearings
authorized by this section shall be in accordance with the usual and customary
rules provided for such hearings.
§ 2356. APPEAL
Any applicant or licensee, or the State acting through the Attorney General,
aggrieved by the decision of the Department of Health after a hearing may,
within 30 days after entry of the decision as provided in section 2355 of this
title, appeal to the Superior Court for the district in which the appellant is
located. The court may affirm, modify, or reverse the Department’s decision,
and either the applicant or licensee or the Department or State may appeal to
the Vermont Supreme Court for such further review as is provided by law.
Pending final disposition of the matter, the status quo of the applicant or
licensee shall be preserved, except as the court otherwise orders in the public
interest.
VT LEG #378788 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.40
2025 Page 8 of 10
§ 2357. INSPECTIONS
The Department of Health shall make or cause to be made such inspections
and investigations as it deems necessary. If the Department finds a violation as
the result of an inspection or investigation, the Department shall post a report
on the Department’s website summarizing the violation and any corrective
action required.
§ 2358. RECORDS
(a) Information received by the Department of Health through filed reports,
inspections, or as otherwise authorized by law shall:
(1) not be disclosed publicly in a manner that identifies or may lead to
the identification of one or more individuals or birth centers;
(2) be exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public
Records Act; and
(3) be kept confidential except as it relates to a proceeding regarding
licensure of a birth center.
(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to the
summary reports of violations required to be posted on the Department’s
website pursuant to section 2357 of this chapter.
§ 2359. RULES
The Department of Health shall adopt rules in accordance with 3 V.S.A.
chapter 25 as needed to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The rules shall
VT LEG #378788 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.40
2025 Page 9 of 10
align the regulation of birth centers in Vermont with the national birth center
standards published by the American Association of Birth Centers and may
include provisions regarding:
(1) the scope of services that may be provided at a birth center;
(2) appropriate staffing for a birth center, including the types of licensed
health care professionals who may practice at a birth center; and
(3) a requirement for written practice guidelines and policies that
include procedures for transferring a patient to a hospital if circumstances
warrant.
§ 2360. NO EFFECT ON SCOPE OF SERVICES
Nothing in this chapter or in rules adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be
construed to limit the scope of the services that a licensed midwife, certified
nurse midwife, or other health care professional working within that health
care professional’s scope of practice may offer or perform in a space that is
shared with or adjacent to a birth center.
Sec. 5. 8 V.S.A. § 4099d is amended to read:
§ 4099d. MIDWIFERY COVERAGE; HOME BIRTHS
(a) A health insurance plan or health benefit plan providing maternity
benefits shall also provide coverage:
(1) for services rendered by a midwife licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A.
chapter 85 or an advanced practice registered nurse licensed pursuant to
VT LEG #378788 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.40
2025 Page 10 of 10
26 V.S.A. chapter 28 who is certified as a nurse midwife for services within
the licensed midwife’s or certified nurse midwife’s scope of practice and
provided in a hospital, birth center, or other health care facility or at home; and
(2) for prenatal, maternity, postpartum, and newborn services provided
at a birth center licensed pursuant to 18 V.S.A. chapter 53, including birth
center facility fees.
* * *
Sec. 6. AGENCY OF HUMAN SERVICES; MEDICAID; REQUEST FOR
FEDERAL APPROVAL
The Agency of Human Services shall seek approval from the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services to allow Vermont Medicaid to cover prenatal,
maternity, postpartum, and newborn services provided at a licensed birth
center and to allow Vermont Medicaid to reimburse separately for birth center
services, including birth center facility fees, and for professional services.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026, except that the Agency of
Human Services shall submit its request for approval of Medicaid coverage of
birth center services as set forth in Sec. 4 to the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services on or before July 1, 2025, and the Medicaid coverage shall
begin on the later of the date of approval or January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #378788 v.1